Illinois, session 104th, HB4773.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Climate Change Superfund Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7    (1) Climate alteration poses an extreme threat to the 8public health, safety, and general welfare in the State. 9Fossil fuels are by far the largest contributors to climate 10change. The State must take action to adapt to the impacts of 11climate change, including impacts from increasing 12temperatures, extreme weather events, flooding, drought, 13fragmenting ecosystems, disappearing native biodiversity, 14exacerbated respiratory illnesses, damaged agricultural 15outputs, and other climate-change-driven threats.16    (2) Adaptation needs include, but are not limited to, 17improving and expanding local flood control infrastructure to 18reduce the impact of severe rainfall that is increasingly 19common across Illinois; installing infrastructure in cities to 20reduce severe urban heat events; building cooling facilities 21in communities and on farms for livestock; upgrading drinking 22water facilities and monitoring equipment to account for 23changes in groundwater availability and quality; restoring and   HB4773- 2 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1maintaining wetlands, grasslands, and other native ecosystems 2to manage distortions in biodiversity; and distributing water, 3medical resources, and other public health necessities in 4large urban and isolated rural communities affected by climate 5disasters.6    (3) Scientific analyses attribute more than 70% of 7post-1988 global greenhouse gas emissions to the world's 100 8largest fossil fuel companies, underscoring their elevated 9responsibility.10    (4) Based on decades of research, it is now possible to 11determine specific fossil fuel producing companies' share of 12responsibility for greenhouse gases released into the 13atmosphere over the last 50 years or more, making it possible 14to assign liability to and require compensation from companies 15commensurate with the emissions attributable to their fossil 16fuel production during a given time period.17    (5) This Act establishes a climate change adaptation cost 18recovery program that will require large fossil fuel 19producers, which have contributed significantly to the buildup 20of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere, to bear a proportionate 21share of the cost of infrastructure investments and other 22expenses necessary for adaptation to the impacts of climate 23change in Illinois. Large fossil fuel producers are readily 24identifiable and economically well positioned to contribute to 25the Illinois Climate Change Superfund.26    (6) The obligation to pay under the program will be based   HB4773- 3 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1on the producers' historic contributions to the accumulation 2of the greenhouse gases that fuel climate change. The program 3operates under a standard of strict liability because the 4challenge associated with adapting to climate change presents 5onerous costs that would otherwise be unfairly shouldered 6predominantly by the State and its taxpayers. Responsible 7parties, as defined in this Act, will be required to pay into 8the Fund because their fossil fuel extraction and refining 9played a significant role in causing the climate pollution 10that now requires significant adaptation investments. This Act 11is remedial in nature and is not punitive, seeking 12compensation to address costs resulting from the past actions 13of polluters. No finding of wrongdoing is required.14    (7) The program will cover emissions associated with the 15responsible parties' fossil fuel production from 2000 through 162024, a period during which the science of climate change was 17well established, including the role of fossil fuels, and 18robust data exist to allocate proportional responsibility. 19    Section 10. Definitions.20    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 21Agency.22    "Annual payment date" means the date, as determined by the 23Agency, by which a responsible party shall pay its cost 24recovery demand.25    "Cost recovery demand" means a charge assessed against a   HB4773- 4 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1responsible party for cost recovery payments, as determined 2under Section 20.3    "Costs" means direct and indirect costs in 4inflation-adjusted dollars to State, local, and tribal 5governments and Illinois residents incurred and projected to 6be incurred in the future to prepare for, prevent, adapt, or 7respond to the damages and harms associated with the impacts 8of covered fossil fuel emissions.9    "Covered fossil fuel emissions" means, with respect to any 10entity, the total quantity of greenhouse gases released into 11the atmosphere at any time resulting from the use of fossil 12fuels or petroleum products extracted or refined by such 13entity during the covered period, expressed in metric tons of 14carbon dioxide equivalent, including, but not limited to, 15releases of greenhouse gases.16    "Covered period" means the period that began January 1, 172000 and ended December 31, 2024.18    "Fossil fuel" means coal, crude oil, petroleum products, 19or fuel gases, or their byproducts.20    "Fuel gas" includes, but is not limited to, methane, 21natural gas, liquefied natural gas, and manufactured fuel gas.22    "Fund" means the Illinois Climate Change Superfund 23established under Section 15.24    "Greenhouse gas" means carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous 25oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, sulfur 26hexafluoride, and any other substance emitted into the air   HB4773- 5 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1that may be reasonably anticipated to cause or contribute to 2anthropogenic climate change.3    "Notice of cost recovery demand" means a written or 4electronic communication informing a responsible party of the 5amount of cost recovery demand due, payable to the Fund.6    "Petroleum products" means a liquid hydrocarbon at 7atmospheric temperature and pressure that is the product of 8the fractionation, distillation, or other refining or 9processing of crude oil and that is used as, usable as, or may 10be refined as, a fuel or fuel blendstock, including, but not 11limited to, gasoline, diesel fuel, aviation fuel, bunker fuel, 12and renewable fuels containing more than 5% petroleum 13products.14    "Program" means the Illinois Climate Change Superfund 15Program established under Section 25.16    "Qualifying expenditures" means expenditures for projects 17and programs within the State in support of climate change 18adaptation, including operational and maintenance expenses, 19and including both new projects and enhancement of existing 20facilities, infrastructure, or other projects to adapt to the 21existing and projected impacts from covered fossil fuel 22emissions. "Qualifying expenditures" includes, but is not 23limited to:24        (1) expenditures for projects and programs that adapt 25    to climate change and climate change's impacts to State, 26    local, and tribal governments and Illinois residents, such   HB4773- 6 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1    as through building and infrastructure resilience; 2        (2) climate-resilient housing; 3        (3) green infrastructure enhancements to counter heat 4    island effects; 5        (4) relocation expenses for residents displaced by 6    acute weather phenomena or long-term changes in local 7    environmental conditions; 8        (5) water management infrastructure, such as water 9    mains, stormwater systems, and sewers; 10        (6) emergency response systems for water distribution 11    and emergency cooling stations; 12        (7) improvements to agricultural facilities to improve 13    crop and livestock durability to extreme weather; and14        (8) ecosystem restoration and maintenance on public 15    lands.16    "Qualifying expenditures" also includes reasonable 17expenses associated with the administration of the Fund. 18"Qualifying expenditures" shall be construed broadly and shall 19include projects or programs that address climate change as a 20contributing, even if not sole, factor for adaptation needs. 21However, all qualifying expenditures must have a rational 22nexus to localized impacts attributable in part to climate 23change, and they must serve the goals identified in Section 5.24    "Responsible party" means an entity (or a successor in 25interest to such entity) that, during any part of the covered 26period, was engaged in the trade or business of extracting   HB4773- 7 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1fossil fuel or refining crude oil and is determined by the 2Agency to be responsible for more than one billion tons of 3covered fossil fuel emissions. "Responsible party" does not 4include any person who lacks sufficient connection with the 5State to satisfy the nexus requirements of the United States 6Constitution. 7    Section 15. Fund; report.8    (a) The Illinois Climate Change Superfund is hereby 9created as a special fund in the State treasury.10    (b) Moneys in the Fund shall, subject to appropriation, be 11used to implement the program under Section 25 and rules 12adopted under Section 25, including qualifying expenditures, 13and to reimburse any outstanding loan made from other funds 14used to finance the initial costs of the Agency's activities 15in implementing this Act. Moneys in the Fund shall not be 16expended for any purposes not specified in this Act or rules 17adopted under this Act.18    (c) Moneys collected under Section 20 and rules adopted 19under Section 20 shall be deposited into the Fund.20    (d) Moneys in the Fund shall be expended on qualifying 21expenditures in accordance with rules adopted by the Agency 22under Section 25.23    (e) Not less than 40% of the moneys must be expended for 24projects and programs that directly benefit disadvantaged 25communities, as defined by the Agency, facing climate change   HB4773- 8 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1impacts.2    (f) The Agency shall prepare and submit a report to the 3General Assembly within 6 months of the effective date of this 4Act to make recommendations regarding the size of the Fund 5under this Section, following consideration of data analyzing 6the costs to the State, including adaptation needs, from 7fossil fuel production by responsible parties. 8    Section 20. Apportionment of liability.9    (a) Within one year of the effective date of this Act, the 10Agency shall adopt rules for, at a minimum, the following 11purposes, subject to the express conditions described in this 12Section:13        (1) adopting methodologies to identify responsible 14    parties and their applicable share of covered fossil fuel 15    emissions consistent with the provisions of this Act;16        (2) registering entities that are responsible parties 17    under the Act;18        (3) issuing notices of cost recovery demand to 19    responsible parties informing them of the cost recovery 20    demand amount, the method and location for payment of cost 21    recovery demands, the potential consequences of nonpayment 22    and late payment, and information regarding the rights of 23    parties to contest an assessment, with the following 24    requirements:25            (A) with respect to each responsible party, the   HB4773- 9 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1        cost recovery demand shall be equal to an amount that 2        bears the same ratio to the Fund's overall size as the 3        responsible party's applicable share of covered fossil 4        fuel emissions bears to the aggregate applicable 5        shares of covered fossil fuel emissions of all 6        responsible parties;7            (B) the applicable share of covered fossil fuel 8        emissions taken into account under this Section for 9        any responsible party shall be the amount of covered 10        fossil fuel emissions attributable to such responsible 11        party; and12            (C) if an entity owns a minority interest in 13        another entity of 10% or more, the calculation of the 14        entity's applicable share of covered fossil fuel 15        emissions taken into account under this Section shall 16        include the applicable share of covered fossil fuel 17        emissions taken into account under this Section by the 18        entity in which the responsible party holds a minority 19        interest, multiplied by the percentage of the minority 20        interest held;21        (4) accepting payments from, pursuing collection 22    efforts against, and negotiating settlements with 23    responsible parties, with the following requirements:24            (A) payments may be made in annual installments 25        over the course of 5 years; 26            (B) each annual installment under subparagraph (A)   HB4773- 10 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1        must be equal, and, at a minimum, 20% of the amount 2        contained in the notice of cost recovery demand, 3        unless the responsible party has paid more than 80% of 4        that amount in previous installments; and5            (C) for the annual installments under subparagraph 6        (A), a responsible party may opt to pay more than 20% 7        of the amount contained in the notice of cost recovery 8        demand at any time; and9        (5) adopting procedures for identifying and selecting 10    projects and programs eligible to receive qualifying 11    expenditures, issuance of requests for proposals from 12    localities and not-for-profit and community organizations, 13    grants to private individuals, or other methods as 14    determined by the Agency, and for disbursing moneys from 15    the Fund for qualifying expenditures.16    (b) The Agency shall hold at least 2 public hearings, one 17in-person and one virtual, on proposed rules under this Act.18    (c) Within 6 months of adopting the rules under this Act, 19the Agency shall serve notices of cost recovery demand on each 20responsible party.21    (d) In determining the amount of covered fossil fuel 22emissions attributable to any entity, the Agency shall use the 23U.S. Environmental Protection Agency's Emissions Factors for 24Greenhouse Gas Inventories as applied to the fossil fuel 25volume data, as those factors existed on December 31, 2024. 26Additionally:  HB4773- 11 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1        (1) In determining the amount of greenhouse gas 2    emissions attributable to any entity, the Agency may:3            (A) require an entity to provide information to 4        the Agency related to past practices, production, 5        extraction, refining, emissions, or other historical 6        information about the entity necessary or appropriate 7        to enable the Agency to determine whether such entity 8        is a responsible party and, if so, the amount of such 9        responsible party's covered fossil fuel emissions; and10            (B) use any pertinent financial information 11        provided by the entity to the Department of Revenue or 12        the United States Department of the Treasury.13    (e) Each responsible party shall be strictly liable to the 14State of Illinois for the amount contained in its notice of 15cost recovery demand. Each responsible party shall make 16compensatory payments to the State of Illinois.17    (f) The amounts listed in the notice of cost recovery 18demand shall accrue interest at a rate equal to the rate of 19inflation for each fiscal year, as measured by the Consumer 20Price Index for All Urban Consumers as published by the United 21States Department of Labor for the previous year.22    (g) The unpaid balance of all remaining installments shall 23become due immediately if any of the following occurs:24        (1) the responsible party fails to pay any installment 25    by the due date under this Act;26        (2) there is a liquidation or sale of substantially   HB4773- 12 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1    all the assets of the responsible party; or2        (3) the responsible party ceases to do business.3    (h) Payment of the cost recovery demand may be stayed by 4the Agency or a court pending administrative or judicial 5resolution, as applicable, of a challenge filed under Section 630. While a cost recovery demand is stayed, it will continue to 7accrue interest.8    (i) Liability under this Act is retroactive for the 9covered period.10    (j) The Agency, the Department of Revenue, and the 11Attorney General are hereby authorized to implement and 12enforce the provisions of this Act. 13    Section 25. Illinois Climate Change Superfund Program; 14projects to be funded; criteria for eligible projects; rules. 15Within one year of the effective date of this Act, the Agency 16shall adopt rules to implement and administer this Act, 17including to establish an Illinois Climate Change Superfund 18Program that creates a procedure for acceptance, 19consideration, and enactment of proposals from the public for 20qualifying expenditures throughout the State of Illinois. The 21Agency shall consider submissions from the public and evaluate 22those submissions based on their eligibility for funding under 23the program and their potential to assist with addressing the 24health, safety, and general welfare challenges posed by 25climate change in Illinois.    HB4773- 13 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1    Section 30. Appeals process.2    (a) The Agency shall establish procedures for an entity to 3challenge its designation as a responsible party under this 4Act or the amount of its liability relative to other entities, 5as determined by reference to its overall fiscal year 2025 6profits.7    (b) A request for reconsideration shall state the grounds 8for the request and include supporting documentation. The 9Agency shall issue a subsequent notice of cost recovery demand 10or a retraction. It shall be within the Agency's sole 11discretion to determine whether a further administrative 12appellate process will be provided. If no further 13administrative appellate process is provided, the Agency's 14subsequent notice of cost recovery demand or retraction shall 15constitute final agency action.16    (c) A responsible party may seek judicial review of a 17determination made by the Agency under this Section under the 18Administrative Review Law.19    (d) A responsible party may not seek judicial review of 20its liability or of any other determination made by the Agency 21under this Act under the Administrative Review Law unless it 22has first exhausted all administrative review opportunities 23before the Agency. 24    Section 35. Miscellaneous provisions. This Act does not   HB4773- 14 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1regulate emissions or restrict responsible parties from future 2extraction, production, refining, combustion, or sale of 3fossil fuels, and does not seek to punish responsible parties.  4    Section 40. State preemption. This Act does not:5        (1) relieve the liability of an entity for damages 6    resulting from climate change, as provided by law;7        (2) abrogate the authority of home rule jurisdictions 8    to tax, fine, restrict, or otherwise regulate activities 9    of responsible parties, to the extent otherwise permitted 10    by existing State and federal law;11        (3) preempt, displace, or restrict any rights or 12    remedies of a person, the State of Illinois, states other 13    than Illinois, units of local government within or outside 14    Illinois, or tribal governments under law relating to a 15    past, present, or future allegation of any of the 16    following:17            (A) deception concerning the effects of fossil 18        fuels on climate change;19            (B) damage or injury resulting from the role of 20        fossil fuels in contributing to climate change; or21            (C) failure to avoid damage or injury related to 22        climate change, including claims for nuisance, 23        trespass, battery, design defect, negligence, failure 24        to warn, or deceptive or unfair practices and claims 25        for injunctive, declaratory, monetary, or other   HB4773- 15 -LRB104 17641 BDA 31072 b1        relief; or2        (4) preempt or supersede any State law or rule or 3    local ordinance, regulation, policy, or program, 4    including, but not limited to, those that do any of the 5    following:6            (A) limit, set, or enforce standards for emissions 7        of greenhouse gases;8            (B) monitor, report, or keep records of emissions 9        of greenhouse gases;10            (C) collect revenue through fees or levy taxes; or11            (D) conduct or support investigations. 12    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 13severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 14    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 15Section 5.1038 as follows: 16    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)17    Sec. 5.1038. The Illinois Climate Change Superfund.